Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.600

Collaboration with local coordinating coalitions to advance transportation services for persons with special transportation needs.

A municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional transit authority shall work collaboratively with the appropriate local coordinating coalition or coalitions as described under *RCW 47.06B.070 to advance the coordination of and maximize efficiencies in transportation services provided to persons with special transportation needs as defined in *RCW 47.06B.012.

[ 2009 c 515 s 13.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 47.06B.070 and 47.06B.012 were repealed by 2011 c 60 s 51.